Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1663
Record-keeping requirements; maintenance, operation, and inspection; Chief Water Officer; powers.

(1) The Chief Water Officer shall require owners to keep original records and any modifications to construction available and in good order.

(2) The Chief Water Officer may:

(a) Adopt such rules and regulations and issue such orders as necessary to secure adequate maintenance, operation, and inspection by owners;

(b) Require engineering and geologic investigations to safeguard life and property;

(c) Accept approvals and reports of equivalent inspections prepared for dams under a federal dam safety program; and

(d) Enter into cooperative agreements with the owners of dams which are required to comply with a federal dam safety program that has objectives, standards, and requirements that meet or exceed the purposes of the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 63;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 301.